Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4546.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3406tt. An insurer that delivers, issues for delivery, or renews in this state a health insurance policy that provides prescription drug coverage shall comply with section 12 of the prescription drug cost and affordability review act. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S00487'25) or House Bill No. 4544 (request no. H00487'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.